Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Enterprise Security Program

§ 25-53-201.
Enterprise Security Program established to provide for coordinated oversight of cybersecurity efforts across state agencies.

There is hereby established the Enterprise Security Program which shall provide for the coordinated oversight of the cybersecurity efforts across all state agencies, including cybersecurity systems, services and the development of policies, standards and guidelines.

The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS), in conjunction with all state agencies, shall provide centralized management and coordination of state policies for the security of data and information technology resources, which such information shall be compiled by MDITS and distributed to each participating state agency. MDITS shall:

Serve as sole authority, within the constraints of this statute, for defining the specific enterprise cybersecurity systems and services to which this statute is applicable;

Acquire and operate enterprise technology solutions to provide services to state agencies when it is determined that such operation will improve the cybersecurity posture in the function of any agency, institution or function of state government as a whole;

Provide oversight of enterprise security policies for state data and information technology (IT) resources including, the following:

Establishing and maintaining the security standards and policies for all state data and IT resources state agencies shall implement to the extent that they apply; and

Including the defined enterprise security requirements as minimum requirements in the specifications for solicitation of state contracts for procuring data and information technology systems and services;

Adhere to all policies, standards and guidelines in the management of technology infrastructure supporting the state data centers, telecommunications networks and backup facilities;

Coordinate and promote efficiency and security with all applicable laws and regulations in the acquisition, operation and maintenance of state data, cybersecurity systems and services used by agencies of the state;

Manage, plan and coordinate all enterprise cybersecurity systems under the jurisdiction of the state;

Develop, in conjunction with agencies of the state, coordinated enterprise cybersecurity systems and services for all state agencies;

Provide ongoing analysis of enterprise cybersecurity systems and services costs, facilities and systems within state government;

Develop policies, procedures and long-range plans for the use of enterprise cybersecurity systems and services;

Form an advisory council of information security officers from each state agency to plan, develop and implement cybersecurity initiatives;

Coordinate the activities of the advisory council to provide education and awareness, identify cybersecurity-related issues, set future direction for cybersecurity plans and policy, and provide a forum for interagency communications regarding cybersecurity;

Charge respective user agencies on a reimbursement basis for their proportionate cost of the installation, maintenance and operation of the cybersecurity systems and services; and

Require cooperative utilization of cybersecurity systems and services by aggregating users.

Each state agency’s executive director or agency head shall:

Be solely responsible for the security of all data and IT resources under its purview, irrespective of the location of the data or resources. Locations include data residing:

At agency sites;

On agency real property and tangible and intangible assets;

On infrastructure in the State Data Centers;

At a third party location;

In transit between locations;

Ensure that an agency-wide security program is in place;

Designate an information security officer to administer the agency’s security program;

Ensure the agency adheres to the requirements established by the Enterprise Security Program, to the extent that they apply;

Participate in all Enterprise Security Program initiatives and services in lieu of deploying duplicate services specific to the agency;

Develop, implement and maintain written agency policies and procedures to ensure the security of data and IT resources. The agency policies and procedures are confidential information and exempt from public inspection, except that the information must be available to the Office of the State Auditor in performing auditing duties;

Implement policies and standards to ensure that all of the agency’s data and IT resources are maintained in compliance with state and federal laws and regulations, to the extent that they apply;

Implement appropriate cost-effective safeguards to reduce, eliminate or recover from identified threats to data and IT resources;

Ensure that internal assessments of the security program are conducted. The results of the internal assessments are confidential and exempt from public inspection, except that the information must be available to the Office of the State Auditor in performing auditing duties;

Include all appropriate cybersecurity requirements in the specifications for the agency’s solicitation of state contracts for procuring data and information technology systems and services;

Include a general description of the security program and future plans for ensuring security of data in the agency long-range information technology plan;

Participate in annual information security training designed specifically for the executive director or agency head to ensure that such individual has an understanding of:

The information and information systems that support the operations and assets of the agency;

The potential impact of common types of cyber-attacks and data breaches on the agency’s operations and assets;

How cyber-attacks and data breaches on the agency’s operations and assets could impact the operations and assets of other state agencies on the Enterprise State Network;

How cyber-attacks and data breaches occur;

Steps to be undertaken by the executive director or agency head and agency employees to protect their information and information systems; and

The annual reporting requirements required of the executive director or agency head.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 316, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.